Washington statutes.
RCW 18.380.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Certified behavior technician" means a paraprofessional who implements a behavior analysis treatment plan under the close, ongoing supervision of a licensed behavior analyst or a licensed assistant behavior analyst, but who does not design or supervise the implementation of a behavior analysis treatment plan.

(2) "Committee" means the Washington state applied behavior analysis advisory committee.

(3) "Department" means the department of health.

(4) "Licensed assistant behavior analyst" means an individual who is licensed under this chapter to engage in the practice of applied behavior analysis under the supervision of a licensed behavior analyst.

(5) "Licensed behavior analyst" means an individual who is licensed under this chapter to engage in the practice of applied behavior analysis.

(6)(a) "Practice of applied behavior analysis" means:

(i) The design, implementation, and evaluation of instructional and environmental modifications based on scientific research and the direct observation and measurement of behavior and the environment to produce socially significant improvements in human behavior;

(ii) Empirical identification of functional relations between behavior and environmental factors, known as functional assessment and analysis; and

(iii) Utilization of contextual factors, motivating operations, antecedent stimuli, positive reinforcement, and other consequences to assist individuals in developing new behaviors, increasing or decreasing existing behaviors, and emitting behaviors under specific environmental conditions.

(b) "Practice of applied behavior analysis" does not include psychological testing, diagnosis of a mental or physical disorder, neuropsychology, psychotherapy, cognitive therapy, sex therapy, psychoanalysis, hypnotherapy, or counseling as treatment modalities. It also does not include the use of behavioral techniques described in (a)(iii) of this subsection alone as treatment modalities.

(7) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.

[ 2015 c 118 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 c 118: "Except for sections 4 and 16 of this act, this act takes effect July 1, 2017." [ 2015 c 118 s 15.]